Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Regulations for the Promotion of Breast Feeding by Mothers of Children in Child Care Facilities

§ 43-20-31.
Department of Health to promulgate regulations for child care facilities to promote breast-feeding by mothers of children being cared for in facility.

The Department of Health shall promulgate regulations to ensure that licensed child care facilities shall be required to comply with the following:

Breast-feeding mothers, including employees, shall be provided a sanitary place that is not a toilet stall to breast-feed their children or express milk. This area shall provide an electrical outlet, comfortable chair, and nearby access to running water.

A refrigerator will be made available for storage of expressed breast milk following guidelines from the American Academy of Pediatrics and Centers for Disease Control in ensuring that breast milk is properly treated to avoid waste. Universal precautions are not required in handling human milk.

Staff shall be trained in the safe and proper storage and handling of human milk.

Breast-feeding promotion information will be displayed in order to positively promote breast-feeding to the clients of the facility.

Such other requirements as the Board of Health finds desirable or necessary to promote and protect breast-feeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 520, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).